fr: Gamme de tailles du patron de couture: Adulte; Bébé; Enfant; Poupée; Maternité; Hommes; Plages de tailles mixtes/multiples; Taille unique; Animal de compagnie; Grande taille; Tout-petit; Préadolescent; Adulte unisexe; Femmes; Autre
es: Rango de tamaño del patrón de costura: Adulto; Bebé; Infantil; Muñeca; Maternidad; Hombre; Rangos de tallas mixtos/múltiples; Talla única; Mascota; Talla grande; Niño pequeño; Preadolescente; Adulto unisex; Mujer; Otro
da: Størrelsesinterval for symønster: Voksen; Baby; Barn; Dukke; Ventetøj; Mænd; Blandede/flere størrelsesintervaller; One size; Kæledyr; Plus size; Tumling; Tween; Unisex voksen; Kvinder; Andet
en: Sewing pattern size range: Adult; Baby; Child; Doll; Maternity; Men; Mixed/Multiple size ranges; One size; Pet; Plus size; Toddler; Tween; Unisex adult; Women; Other
pl: Zakres rozmiarów wykroju: Dorośli; Niemowlęta; Dzieci; Lalki; Odzież ciążowa; Mężczyźni; Mieszane/różne zakresy rozmiarów; Rozmiar uniwersalny; Zwierzęta; Plus size; Małe dzieci; Nastolatki; Dorośli unisex; Kobiety; Inne
th: ช่วงขนาดของแพทเทิร์นเย็บผ้า: ผู้ใหญ่; ทารก; เด็ก; ตุ๊กตา; คนท้อง; ผู้ชาย; ช่วงขนาดผสม/หลายช่วงขนาด; ขนาดเดียว; สัตว์เลี้ยง; พลัสไซส์; เด็กวัยเตาะแตะ; เด็กก่อนวัยรุ่น; ผู้ใหญ่ (ใส่ได้ทุกเพศ); ผู้หญิง; อื่นๆ
pt-BR: Molde de costura faixa de tamanhos: Adulto; Bebê; Infantil; Boneca; Gestante; Masculino; Misto/Múltiplas faixas de tamanho; Tamanho único; Pet; Plus size; Bebê (1 a 3 anos); Pré-adolescente; Adulto unissex; Feminino; Outros
zh-CN: 缝纫图纸尺码范围: 成人; 婴儿; 儿童; 玩偶; 孕妇; 男士; 混合/多种尺码范围; 均码; 宠物; 大码; 幼儿; 大童; 中性成人; 女士; 其他
nb: Størrelsesområde for symønster: Voksen; Baby; Barn; Dukke; Mamma; Menn; Blandede / flere størrelsesområder; One size; Kjæledyr; Store størrelser; Småbarn; Tween; Voksen unisex; Kvinner; Annet
zh-TW: 縫紉樣板尺寸範圍: 成人; 嬰兒; 兒童; 玩偶; 孕婦; 男款; 混合/多尺寸範圍; 單一尺寸; 寵物; 大尺碼; 幼童; 大童; 成人男女皆宜; 女款; 其他
hr-HR: Raspon veličina krojeva za šivanje: Za odrasle; Za bebe; Za djecu; Za lutke; Za trudnice; Za muškarce; Mješoviti / višestruki rasponi veličina; Univerzalna veličina; Za kućne ljubimce; Veći brojevi; Za malu djecu; Za stariju djecu; Uniseks (za odrasle); Za žene; Ostalo
sk-SK: Rozsah veľkostí šijacieho strihu: Dospelí; Bábätká; Deti; Bábika; Tehotenské; Muži; Zmiešané/viacero veľkostných rozsahov; Univerzálna veľkosť; Zvieratá; Nadmerné veľkosti (Plus size); Batoľatá; Staršie deti (Tween); Unisex dospelí; Ženy; Iné
bg-BG: Диапазон размери на шивашки модел: Възрастен; Бебе; Дете; Кукла; За бременни; Мъже; Смесени/Множество диапазони от размери; Универсален размер; Домашен любимец; Макси размер; Малко дете; За юноши; Унисекс възрастен; Жени; Друго
ro-RO: Interval de mărimi pentru tiparul de croitorie: Adulți; Bebeluși; Copii; Păpușă; Maternitate; Bărbați; Mixte/Gama cu mai multe mărimi; Mărime universală; Animale de companie; Mărimi mari; Copii mici (1-3 ani); Pre-adolescenți; Adulți unisex; Femei; Altele
sl-SI: Razpon velikosti šivalnega kroja: Odrasli; Dojenčki; Otroci; Lutke; Nosečnice; Moški; Mešane/več velikosti; Enotna velikost; Hišni ljubljenčki; Večje velikosti; Malčki; Najstniki; Unisex (odrasli); Ženske; Drugo
pt-PT: Gama de tamanhos do molde de costura: Adultos; Bebés; Crianças; Bonecos; Maternidade; Homens; Mistura/Vários tamanhos; Tamanho único; Animais de estimação; Tamanho plus size; Crianças pequenas; Pré-adolescentes; Adultos unissexo; Mulheres; Outro
lt-LT: Siuvimo modelio dydžių diapazonas: Suaugusiųjų; Kūdikių; Vaikų; Lėlių; Nėščiųjų; Vyrų; Mišrūs / kelių dydžių diapazonai; Vienas dydis; Augintinių; Dideli dydžiai; Mažylių; Priešpaauglių; Unisex suaugusiųjų; Moterų; Kita
nl: Naaipatroon maatbereik: Volwassenen; Baby; Kind; Pop; Zwangerschap; Heren; Gemengde/meerdere maten; One size; Huisdier; Grote maten; Peuter; Tiener; Unisex volwassenen; Dames; Overig
sv: Sömnadsmönstrets storleksintervall: Vuxen; Bebis; Barn; Docka; Gravid; Herr; Blandade/flera storleksintervall; One size; Husdjur; Plus size; Småbarn; Tween; Unisex vuxen; Dam; Annat
vi: Phạm vi kích thước mẫu may: Người lớn; Trẻ sơ sinh; Trẻ em; Búp bê; Bà bầu; Nam giới; Hỗn hợp/Nhiều khoảng kích cỡ; Một kích cỡ; Thú cưng; Ngoại cỡ; Trẻ mới biết đi; Thiếu niên; Người lớn unisex; Nữ giới; Khác
it: Intervallo di taglie del cartamodello: Adulto; Neonato; Bambino; Bambola; Premaman; Uomo; Taglie miste/multiple; Taglia unica; Animale domestico; Taglie forti; Primi passi; Preadolescente; Unisex adulto; Donna; Altro
de: Größenbereich des Schnittmusters: Erwachsene; Baby; Kind; Puppe; Umstandsmode; Herren; Gemischte/Mehrere Größenbereiche; Einheitsgröße; Haustier; Übergröße; Kleinkind; Tween; Unisex Erwachsene; Damen; Sonstige
ja: 縫製パターンのサイズ範囲: 大人用; ベビー; 子供; ドール; マタニティ; メンズ; 複合/複数のサイズ範囲; ワンサイズ; ペット; プラスサイズ; トドラー; ティーンエージャー向け; ユニセックス大人; レディース; その他
el: Εύρος μεγεθών πατρόν ραπτικής: Ενήλικες; Βρέφη; Παιδιά; Κούκλες; Εγκυμοσύνη; Άνδρες; Μικτό/Πολλαπλά εύρη μεγεθών; Ένα μέγεθος; Κατοικίδια; Μεγάλα μεγέθη; Νήπια; Προέφηβοι; Unisex ενηλίκων; Γυναίκες; Άλλο
ko: 재봉 패턴 사이즈 범위: 성인; 아기; 아동; 인형; 임산부; 남성; 혼합/다중 사이즈 범위; 원사이즈; 반려동물; 플러스 사이즈; 유아; 트윈; 남녀 공용 성인; 여성; 기타
ru: Размерный диапазон выкройки: Взрослый; Для младенцев; Детский; Для кукол; Для беременных; Мужской; Смешанные/разные размерные сетки; Единый размер; Для домашних животных; Большие размеры; Для малышей; Для подростков; Унисекс (взрослый); Женский; Другое
cs: Rozsah velikostí šicích vzorů: Dospělí; Miminka; Děti; Panenky; Těhotenské; Muži; Smíšené / více velikostí; Univerzální velikost; Domácí mazlíčci; Nadměrné velikosti; Batolata; Starší děti; Dospělí unisex; Ženy; Jiné
tr: Dikiş kalıbı beden aralığı: Yetişkin; Bebek; Çocuk; Oyuncak bebek; Hamile; Erkek; Karma/çoklu beden aralıkları; Tek beden; Evcil hayvan; Büyük beden; Yürümeye başlayan çocuk; Ön ergen; Üniseks yetişkin; Kadın; Diğer
hu: Varrásminta mérettartománya: Felnőtt; Baba; Gyermek; Játékbaba; Kismama; Férfi; Vegyes/több mérettartomány; Egyméretes; Kisállat; Plus size; Tipegő; Kiskamasz; Unisex felnőtt; Női; Egyéb
fi: Kaavan kokoluokka: Aikuiset; Vauvat; Lapset; Nuket; Äitiys; Miehet; Sekalaiset / useita kokoalueita; Yksi koko; Lemmikit; Plus-koko; Taaperot; Varhaisnuoret; Unisex-aikuiset; Naiset; Muu